Hawaii statutes.
§356D-44 Administration of state low-income
public housing projects and programs. (a) The authority shall construct,
develop, and administer property or housing for the purpose of state low-income
public housing projects and programs.

(b) The authority shall offer any
decommissioned low-income public housing project, except for federal housing
projects, to nonprofit or for-profit organizations or government agencies for
rehabilitation into emergency or transitional shelter facilities for the
homeless or rehabilitation into rental units that set aside at least fifty per
cent of the units to persons or families with incomes at or below fifty per
cent of the area median family income; provided that:

(1) The housing project is wholly owned by the State
on either state-owned or ceded lands;

(2) The authority has determined that the housing
project is not eligible for rehabilitation using the authority's current
resources; and

(3) The nonprofit or for-profit organization or
government agency demonstrates expertise in rehabilitation of housing projects
and has community, public, and private resources to substantially pay for the
rehabilitation.

The land and improvements may be leased to the
nonprofit or for-profit organization or government agency for a period not to
exceed ninety-nine years for a sum of $1 per year.

(c) State low-income housing projects shall be
subject to chapter 521.

(d) The authority shall adopt necessary rules
in accordance with chapter 91, including the establishment and collection of
reasonable fees for administering the state low-income housing projects or
programs and to carry out any state program under subsection (a). [L 2006, c
180, pt of §2; am L 2007, c 249, §35]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next